Wisconsin, session 2025, AB421.
do enact as follows:AB421,13Section 1. 66.0132 of the statutes is created to read:AB421,1,5466.0132 Prohibiting rights of nature ordinances. (1) Definitions. In 5this section:AB421,1,66(a) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB421,2,27(b) “Rights of nature ordinance” means an ordinance conferring legal rights to 1a natural resource to exist, to be protected against pollution, or to maintain a 2healthy ecosystem.AB421,2,43(2) Prohibition. No political subdivision may enact a rights of nature 4ordinance.AB421,2,55